District of Columbia statutes.
1-628.02

Agreements required.

The Mayor shall enter into an agreement with the United States Civil Service Commission to carry out the purposes of subchapters XXI, XXII, and XXVI of this chapter.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2802, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-629.2.
1973 Ed., § 1-358.2.